old_src/pron-kal-lex.txt
LEXICON IndefPron1	!(kinaluunniit)
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Sg:kinaluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Pl:kikkulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Sg:kialuunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Sg+SUB:kialluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Pl:kikkulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Sg:kimilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Pl:kikkunnilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Sg:kimulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Pl:kikkunnulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Sg:kimiluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Pl:kikkunniluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Sg:kimilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Pl:kikkunnilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Sg:kikkulluuniit	IndefPronK ;	!kikkut? imalt. kinakkut?
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Pl:kikkunatigulluunniit	IndefPronK ;	!kikkunatigut? imalt. kikkutigut?
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Sg:kinatulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
kina+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Pl:kikkunatulluunniit	IndefPronK ;

LEXICON IndefPron2	!(sunaluunniit)
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Sg:sunaluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Pl:suulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Sg:suulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Pl:suulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Sg:sumilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Pl:sunilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Sg:sumulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Pl:sunulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Sg:sumiluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Pl:suniluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Sg:sumilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Pl:sunilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Sg:sukkulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Pl:sutigulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Sg:sutulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
suna+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Pl:sunatulluunniit	IndefPronK ;

LEXICON IndefPron3	!(sorlerluunniit)
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Sg:sorlerluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Pl:sorliilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Sg:sorliulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Pl:sorliilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Sg:sorlermilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Pl:sorlernilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Sg:sorlermulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Pl:sorlernulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Sg:sorlermiluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Pl:sorlerniluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Sg:sorlermilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Pl:sorlernilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Sg:sorlikkulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Pl:sorliitigulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Sg:sorlertulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
sorleq+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Pl:sorliittulluunniit	IndefPronK ;

LEXICON IndefPron4	!(qassilluunniit)
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abs+Pl:qassilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Rel+Pl:qassilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Ins+Pl:qassinilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Trm+Pl:qassinulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Lok+Pl:qassiniluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Abl+Pl:qassinilluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Via+Pl:qassitigulluunniit	IndefPronK ;
qassit+LUUNNIIT+IndefPron+Aeq+Pl:qassitulluunniit	IndefPronK ;

LEXICON IndefPronK	!(Enklitiske endelser til indefinitte pronominer)
+LI:%CLITli	# ;
+LU:%CLITlu	# ;
+MI:%CLITmi # ;
+NGOOQ:%CLITngooq	# ;
	# ;

LEXICON PersPron1	!(uanga:ua)
+SUAQ+nn+PersPron+1Sg:%>ngarsuaq	K ;
+SUAQ+nn+PersPron+1Pl:%>gorsuit	K ;
+PersPron+U+nv:%>ngaa	IV_voq ;
+PersPron+U+nv:%>guu	IV_voqP ;
+PersPron+Abs+1Sg:%>nga	K ;
+PersPron+Abs+1Pl:%>gut	K ;
+PersPron+Rel+1Sg:%>nga	K ;
+PersPron+Rel+1Pl:%>gut	K ;
+PersPron+Ins+1Sg:%>nnik	K ;
+PersPron+Ins+1Pl:%>tsinnik	K ;
+PersPron+Ins+1Pl:%>gutsinnik	K ;
+PersPron+Abl+1Sg:%>nnit	AblVb ;
+PersPron+Abl+1Pl:%>tsinnit	AblVb ;
+PersPron+Abl+1Pl:%>gutsinnit	AblVb ;
+PersPron+Lok+1Sg:%>nni	LokVb ;
+PersPron+Lok+1Pl:%>tsinni	LokAeq ;
+PersPron+Lok+1Pl:%>gutsinni	LokAeq ;
+PersPron+Trm+1Sg:%>nnut	TrmVb ;
+PersPron+Trm+1Pl:%>tsinnut	TrmVb ;
+PersPron+Trm+1Pl:%>gutsinnut	TrmVb ;
+PersPron+Via+1Sg:%>kkut	ViaVb ;
+PersPron+Via+1Pl:%>tsigut	ViaVb ;
+PersPron+Via+1Pl:%>gutsigut	ViaVb ;
+PersPron+Aeq+1Sg:%>ttut	K ;
+PersPron+Aeq+1Pl:%>tsitut	K ;
+PersPron+Aeq+1Pl:%>gutsitut	K ;

LEXICON PersPron2	!(illit:il)
+PersPron+U+nv:%>liu	IV_voq ;
+PersPron+U+nv:%>issiu	IV_voqP ;
+PersPron+Abs+2Sg:%>lit	K ;
+PersPron+Abs+2Pl:%>issi	K ;
+PersPron+Rel+2Sg:%>lit	K ;
+PersPron+Rel+2Pl:%>issi	K ;
+PersPron+Ins+2Sg:%>innik	K ;
+PersPron+Ins+2Pl:%>issinnik	K ;
+PersPron+Abl+2Sg:%>innit	AblVb ;
+PersPron+Abl+2Pl:%>issinnit	AblVb ;
+PersPron+Lok+2Sg:%>inni	LokVb ;
+PersPron+Lok+2Pl:%>issinni	LokVb ;
+PersPron+Trm+2Sg:%>innut	TrmVb ;
+PersPron+Trm+2Pl:%>issinnut	TrmVb ;
+PersPron+Via+2Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ;
+PersPron+Via+2Pl:%>issigut	ViaVb ;
+PersPron+Aeq+2Sg:%>ittut	K ;
+PersPron+Aeq+2Pl:%>issitut	K ;

LEXICON ReflPron1	!(immi)
+ReflPron+Ins+Sg:%>nik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl:%>nnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Sg:%>ni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl:%>nni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg:%>nit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl:%>nnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Sg:%>nut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl:%>nnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Sg:%>kkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl:%>kkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Sg:%>sut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl:%>ssut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>tsitut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>ssitut	K ;

LEXICON ReciPron1	!(nammineq:nammi)
+ReflPron+U+nv:%>niu	IV_voq ;
+ReflPron+U+nv:%>niu	IV_voqP ;
+PALAAQ+nn+ReflPron+Sg:%>nipalaaq	K ;
+RUJUK+nn+ReflPron+Sg:%>nerujuk	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Sg:%>nermi	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl:%>nerni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Sg:%>nermik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl:%>nernik	K ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg:%>nermit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl:%>nernit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Sg:%>nermut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl:%>nernut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Sg:%>nikkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl:%>nertigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Sg:%>nertut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl:%>nertut	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+1Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+1Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+2Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+2Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+4Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Abs+4Pl:%>nneq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+1Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+1Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+2Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+2Pl:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+4Sg:%>neq	K ;
+ReflPron+Rel+4Pl:%>nneq	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ninnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>ninnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssinnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nerminik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnerminnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nerminnik	K ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ninni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>ninni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssinni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nermini	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnerminni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nerminni	LokVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ninnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>ninnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssinnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nerminit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nerminiit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnerminnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nerminnit	AblVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>ninnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>ninnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssinnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nerminut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnerminnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nerminnut	TrmVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nikkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nikkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nermigut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnermikkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nermikkut	ViaVb ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>nittut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>nitsitut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss+SUB:%>tsitut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>nikkut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>nissitut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss+SUB:%>ssitut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>nermisut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nnermissut	K ;
+ReflPron+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>nermissut	K ;
